Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1058.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "alternative fuels" and "liquid fuels" in section 9002 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 9002. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Alternative fuels." Natural gas, compressed natural gas (CNG), liquified natural gas (LNG), liquid propane gas and liquified petroleum gas (LPG), alcohols, [gasoline-alcohol mixtures containing at least 85% alcohol by volume,] gasoline-ethanol mixtures containing 51% to 83% 85% ethanol by volume as specified by the ASTM International D5798 standard as it existed on the effective date of this definition or a revised standard <--12345678910111213141516171819 determined by ASTM International and specified by the department through regulation, hydrogen, hythane, electricity and any other fuel used to propel motor vehicles on the public highways which is not taxable as fuels or liquid fuels under this chapter.* * *"Liquid fuels." All products derived from petroleum, natural gas, coal, coal tar, vegetable ferments and other oils. The term includes gasoline, naphtha, benzol, benzine or alcohols, either alone or when blended or compounded, which are practically and commercially suitable for use in internal combustion engines for the generation of power or which are prepared, advertised, offered for sale or sold for use for that purpose. The term does not include kerosene, fuel oil, gas oil, diesel fuel, tractor fuel by whatever trade name or technical name known having an initial boiling point of not less than 200 degrees fahrenheit and of which not more than 95% has been recovered at 464 degrees fahrenheit (ASTM International method D-86), liquified gases which would not exist as liquids at a temperature of 60 degrees fahrenheit and pressure of 14.7 pounds per square inch absolute or naphthas and benzols and solvents sold for use for industrial purposes.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1058PN1270 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223